Hawaii statutes.
§11-44 Records of proceedings. The
several boards of registration shall each keep books of record in which full
and detailed minutes shall be preserved of all their proceedings. The minutes
shall be kept from day to day, and shall contain:

(1) The date and place of the meeting;

(2) The names of the members of the board present;

(3) The name of each person to whom an oath is
administered, and, if an examination is held, the names of the witnesses and
the substance of the answers of the applicant and of the witnesses;

(4) The name of any person challenging the right of
any applicant to register, the grounds of challenge, the name of the person
challenged, and the decision rendered thereon; and

(5) All other matters of detail which are likely to
have a bearing upon any question concerning the action of the board or of any
person appearing before it. [L 1970, c 26, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next